Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.260

Legislative committees and agencies—Oversight.

The joint legislative audit and review committee, the joint transportation committee, the select committee on pension policy, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the office of legislative support services, the joint higher education committee, and the *joint legislative systems committee are subject to such operational policies, procedures, and oversight as are deemed necessary by the facilities and operations committee of the senate and the executive rules committee of the house of representatives to ensure operational adequacy of the agencies of the legislative branch. As used in this section, "operational policies, procedures, and oversight" includes the development process of biennial budgets, contracting procedures, personnel policies, and compensation plans, selection of a chief administrator, facilities, and expenditures. This section does not grant oversight authority to the facilities and operations committee of the senate over any standing committee of the house of representatives or oversight authority to the executive rules committee of the house of representatives over any standing committee of the senate.

[ 2012 c 229 s 204; 2012 c 113 s 6; 2005 c 319 s 112; 2003 c 295 s 12; 2001 c 259 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 44.68.020, creating the joint legislative systems committee, was repealed by 2020 c 114 s 1.

(2) This section was amended by 2012 c 113 s 6 and by 2012 c 229 s 204, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2012 c 113: See note following RCW 44.80.010.

Findings—Intent—Part headings—Effective dates—2005 c 319: See notes following RCW 43.17.020.